Maine, session 132, LD1726.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 2 MRSA §9, sub-§3, ¶D-1 is enacted to read:
D-1. When possible, seek to ensure consistency in energy planning and analysis,
including, but not limited to, through the use, in all energy planning and analysis
conducted by the office, of an energy forecasting method consistent with the method
used by the office in preparing the comprehensive state energy plan as required by
paragraph C. The office shall ensure that the energy forecasting methodology used in
preparing the comprehensive state energy plan is made available for use by other state
agencies;
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Advanced conductor" means an electrical conductor that has a direct current
electrical resistance at least 10% lower than existing conductors of a similar diameter
on the electric system.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§1, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. "Grid-enhancing technology" has the same meaning as in section 3148,
subsection 1, paragraph A.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§4, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 702, §8, is
amended to read:
D. Include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Forecasts of projected load, including forecasts of end-use electrification,
energy efficiency and distributed energy resources and, when appropriate,
consideration of the energy forecasting method used to prepare the comprehensive
state energy plan required pursuant to Title 2, section 9, subsection 3, paragraph C;
(2) Baseline energy supply data and assessments, including but not limited to
planned generation retirements; new generation that is planned or needed,
Page 1 - 132LR0881(03)

including generation of electricity from renewable sources; and energy storage
installations;
(3) Analysis of hosting capacity, including locational benefits of distributed
energy resources and areas of existing or potential system congestion;
(4) Analysis of available and emerging technologies necessary to enable load
management and flexibility and those technologies necessary to improve efficiency
and reliability of and reduce congestion of the grid, including, but not limited to,
the use of advanced conductors and grid-enhancing technologies, taking into
consideration the commission's review pursuant to section 3148;
(5) An assessment of the environmental, equity and environmental justice impacts
of grid plans; and
(6) An identification of cost-effective near-term grid investments and operations
needed to achieve the priorities identified in subsection 2; and
(7) Consideration of the use of low-voltage sensors to improve grid monitoring
capacity, including data related to grid power quality, transformer status and
distributed energy resource capacity by location; and
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3147, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 702, §8, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The commission shall make the filing for each covered utility available for public comment
for a period of no less than 60 days. The commission may order a covered utility to revise
the filing to address any deficiencies. The commission may use the filing and the input
received from interested parties in rate cases or other proceedings involving the covered
utility. In a competitive solicitation conducted by the commission, the commission may
use the filings submitted pursuant to this subsection to develop requests for proposals,
evaluate bids and negotiate agreements in order to optimize grid capacity.
Sec. 6. Assessment of nonwires alternative process. In consultation with the
Efficiency Maine Trust and the Office of the Public Advocate, the Public Utilities
Commission shall conduct a review of the nonwires alternative investigation and
recommendation process established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section
3132-C. The commission's review must assess the efficiency of that process and consider
how that process is incorporated into integrated grid plan filings submitted by large
investor-owned transmission and distribution utilities in accordance with the requirements
established by Title 35-A, section 3147. The review must include the opportunity for
stakeholders to provide comments to the commission. The commission shall develop
recommendations for changes to the nonwires alternative investigation and
recommendation process based on its review, which may include recommended legislation
to better integrate nonwires alternatives into the requirements for grid plan filings. By
March 1, 2026, the commission shall provide a report of its recommendations to the Joint
Standing Committee on Energy, Utilities and Technology. The committee may report out
a bill related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 7. Flexible interconnection; evaluation; reports. The Public Utilities
Commission shall explore and evaluate the feasibility of adopting emerging flexible
interconnection options in order to use distributed energy resources, increase grid capacity,
decrease grid instability and reduce costs in achieving state goals related to clean energy,
Page 2 - 132LR0881(03)

including energy storage and beneficial electrification. In exploring and evaluating flexible
interconnection options, the commission shall:
1. Review potential practices for providing flexible interconnection options;
2. Engage with stakeholders, including members of the interconnection working group
established pursuant to Public Law 2023, chapter 307, section 8;
3. Identify any barriers to adopting flexible interconnection options;
4. Identify ways in which customers seeking connection might benefit from flexible
interconnection processes; and
5. Determine whether the costs of flexible interconnection may affect
noninterconnecting customers and how that may be mitigated.
By February 15, 2026, the commission shall submit an initial report summarizing the
commission's activities under this section to the Joint Standing Committee on Energy,
Utilities and Technology. After reviewing the initial report, the committee may report out
a bill relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature. By
February 15, 2027, the commission shall submit a final report to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy and utility matters that
includes the commission's evaluation of flexible interconnection options, along with any
recommendations. After reviewing the final report, the committee may report out a bill
related to the report to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 8. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that enact the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3147, subsection 1, paragraphs A-1 and B-1 and that amend
Title 35-A, section 3147, subsection 4 take effect February 1, 2026.
Page 3 - 132LR0881(03)